North Carolina, session 2025, HB475.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-37.7(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Expiration and Fee. – A special identification card issued to a person for the first time
under this section expires when a drivers license issued on the same day to that person would
expire. A special identification card renewed under this section expires when a drivers license
renewed by the card holder on the same day would expire. The Division shall offer renewal of a
special identification card in person and online on the Division's Web site.
The fee for a special identification card is the same as the fee set in G.S. 20-14 for a duplicate
license. The fee does not apply to a special identification card issued to a resident of this State as
follows:
…
(2) The applicant is at least 17 16 years old.
…."
SECTION 2.(a) Establishment of Pilot Program. – By no later than December 31,
2025, the Division of Motor Vehicles of the Department of Transportation (DMV), in
conjunction with the North Carolina Department of Public Instruction (DPI) and the governing
bodies of public school units with high schools located in Mecklenburg, Randolph, Union, and
Watauga Counties, shall establish and implement a pilot program to issue a North Carolina
special identification card as provided under G.S. 20-37.7 to eligible students in public high
schools.
SECTION 2.(b) Pilot Program Requirements. – The pilot program established
pursuant to this act shall, at minimum, meet all of the following requirements:
(1) Students that are (i) at least 16 years old and (ii) enrolled in a public high
school located within Mecklenburg, Randolph, Union, or Watauga County
shall be eligible to receive a special identification card.
(2) DMV, DPI, and the governing bodies of public high schools located in
Mecklenburg, Randolph, Union, and Watauga Counties shall provide
*H475-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
information to students and parents regarding the issuance of special
identification cards.
(3) DMV, DPI, and the governing bodies of public high schools located in
Mecklenburg, Randolph, Union, and Watauga Counties shall coordinate
scheduled time to give students the opportunity to obtain special identification
cards. Time to obtain a special identification card shall be scheduled on one
instructional day prior to December 31 of that school year and one
instructional day after December 31 of that school year. If students travel to a
DMV location to obtain the special identification card, the DMV shall have a
dedicated terminal for students during that time. A DMV mobile office may
also be used to satisfy this requirement.
(4) Upon the request of a student, the student's high school shall provide the DMV
with the information required to complete a special identification card
application. This information shall be provided in a manner prescribed by the
DMV.
(5) Notwithstanding G.S. 130A-93 or any other law to the contrary, the State
Registrar is authorized to issue a certified copy of a student's birth certificate
to the governing body of a public high school or the Division upon a student's
request in connection with a special identification card application. The
certified copy of the student's birth certificate is not a public record.
SECTION 2.(c) Expiration of the Pilot Program. – The pilot program required by
this act expires December 31, 2027.
SECTION 3. Applicability. – Section 2 of this act applies to public high schools
located in Mecklenburg, Randolph, Union, and Watauga Counties only.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 475-First Edition